Arkansas, session 2025, HB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(5)(C), concerning additional
funding for professional learning communities, is repealed.
(C)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year and each school year
thereafter, additional funding up to sixteen million five hundred thousand
dollars ($16,500,000) provided for professional development above the amount
in subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be used by the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education for the development and administration of
professional learning communities for the benefit of public school districts.
(ii)(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall promulgate rules to administer the additional professional
development funding under subdivision (b)(5)(C)(i) of this section.
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education may partner with or choose a person, firm, corporation, or
education service cooperative to provide the knowledge, skills, experience,
and expertise for the development of a research-based process for the
implementation of professional learning communities.
*TNL015*
11/21/2024 10:59:49 AM TNL015